en: Support padding: Chest pad; Foam padding; Gel padding; Multi-point padding; Neck pad; Neoprene padding; No padding; Shoulder pad; Thumb pad; Other
sl-SI: Blazinjenje opore: Prsna blazinica; Penasto oblazinjenje; Gelno oblazinjenje; Večtočkovno oblazinjenje; Vratna blazinica; Neoprensko oblazinjenje; Brez oblazinjenja; Ramenska blazinica; Blazinica za palec; Drugo
zh-TW: 背帶襯墊: 胸墊; 泡棉墊; 凝膠墊; 多點軟墊; 頸墊; 氯丁橡膠墊; 無軟墊; 肩墊; 拇指墊; 其他
de: Polsterung der Stütze: Brustpolster; Schaumstoffpolsterung; Gelpolsterung; Mehrpunktpolsterung; Nackenpolster; Neoprenpolsterung; Keine Polsterung; Schulterpolster; Daumenpolster; Sonstige
sv: Stödvaddering: Bröstdyna; Skumvaddering; Gelvaddering; Flerpunktsvaddering; Nackdyna; Neoprenvaddering; Ingen vaddering; Axeldyna; Tumvaddering; Övrigt
nl: Steun voering: Borstkussen; Schuimvulling; Gelvulling; Meerpuntsvulling; Nekkussen; Neopreenvulling; Geen vulling; Schouderkussen; Duimkussen; Overig
ja: サポートパッド: チェストパッド; フォームパッド; ジェルパッド; マルチポイントパッド; ネックパッド; ネオプレンパッド; パッドなし; ショルダーパッド; 親指パッド; その他
sk-SK: Podpora vnútorného okraja: Chránič hrudníka; Penové polstrovanie; Gélové polstrovanie; Viacbodové polstrovanie; Krčná vypchávka; Neoprénové polstrovanie; Bez polstrovania; Ramenná vypchávka; Vypchávka palca; Iné
cs: Polstrování: Hrudní polstrování; Pěnové polstrování; Gelové polstrování; Vícebodové polstrování; Polstrování krku; Neoprenové polstrování; Bez polstrování; Ramenní polstrování; Polstrování palce; Jiné
tr: Destek dolgu özelliği: Göğüs yastığı; Köpük dolgu; Jel dolgu; Çok noktalı dolgu; Boyun yastığı; Neopren dolgu; Dolgu yok; Omuz yastığı; Başparmak yastığı; Diğer
fr: Rembourrage du support: Coussinet de poitrine; Rembourrage en mousse; Rembourrage en gel; Rembourrage multipoints; Coussinet de nuque; Rembourrage en néoprène; Sans rembourrage; Épaulette; Coussinet pour le pouce; Autre
ro-RO: Căptușeală de susținere: Burete pentru piept; Căptușeală din spumă; Căptușeală cu gel; Căptușeală în mai multe puncte; Pernă pentru gât; Căptușeală din neopren; Fără căptușeală; Perniță pentru umăr; Pernă pentru degetul mare; Altele
es: Relleno del soporte: Almohadilla para el pecho; Acolchado de espuma; Acolchado de gel; Acolchado multipunto; Almohadilla para el cuello; Acolchado de neopreno; Sin acolchado; Hombrera; Almohadilla para el pulgar; Otro
fi: Tukipehmuste: Rintapehmuste; Vaahtomuovipehmuste; Geelipehmuste; Monipistepehmuste; Niskatuen pehmuste; Neopreenipehmuste; Ei pehmustetta; Olkapehmuste; Peukalopehmuste; Muu
it: Imbottitura di supporto: Imbottitura per torace; Imbottitura in schiuma; Imbottitura in gel; Imbottitura multipunto; Imbottitura per collo; Imbottitura in neoprene; Nessuna imbottitura; Imbottitura per spalla; Imbottitura per pollice; Altro
el: υποστήριξη εσωτερικό περιθώριο: Μαξιλαράκι στήθους; Επένδυση από αφρώδες υλικό; Επένδυση με τζελ; Επένδυση πολλαπλών σημείων; Μαξιλαράκι λαιμού; Επένδυση από νεοπρένιο; Χωρίς επένδυση; Μαξιλαράκι ώμου; Μαξιλαράκι αντίχειρα; Άλλο
ko: 지지 패딩: 가슴 패드; 폼 패딩; 젤 패딩; 다중 포인트 패딩; 목 패드; 네오프렌 패딩; 패딩 없음; 어깨 패드; 엄지 패드; 기타
pt-PT: Preenchimento do suporte: Almofada para o peito; Preenchimento de espuma; Preenchimento de gel; Preenchimento multiponto; Almofada para o pescoço; Preenchimento de neopreno; Sem preenchimento; Almofada para o ombro; Almofada para o polegar; Outro
da: Støttepolstring: Brystpude; Skumpolstring; Gelpolstring; Flerpunktspolstring; Nakkepude; Neoprenpolstring; Ingen polstring; Skulderpude; Tommelfingerpude; Andet
nb: Støttepolstring: Brystpute; Skumpolstring; Gelpolstring; Flerpunktspolstring; Nakkepute; Neoprenpolstring; Ingen polstring; Skulderpute; Tommelpute; Annet
lt-LT: Atramos paminkštinimas: Krūtinės pagalvėlė; Porolono paminkštinimas; Gelio paminkštinimas; Daugiataškis paminkštinimas; Kaklo pagalvėlė; Neopreno paminkštinimas; Be paminkštinimo; Pečių pagalvėlė; Nykščio pagalvėlė; Kita
ru: Мягкая подкладка опоры: Нагрудная накладка; Поролоновая набивка; Гелевая набивка; Многоточечная набивка; Шейная накладка; Неопреновая набивка; Без набивки; Плечевая накладка; Накладка для большого пальца; Другое
bg-BG: Омекотяване на опората: Подложка за гърдите; Подплата от пяна; Гелова подплата; Многоточкова подплата; Подложка за врата; Неопренова подплата; Без подплата; Подложка за рамото; Подложка за палеца; Друго
pl: Wyściółka podparcia: Poduszka na klatkę piersiową; Wypełnienie piankowe; Wypełnienie żelowe; Wyściółka wielopunktowa; Poduszka pod kark; Wypełnienie neoprenowe; Bez wypełnienia; Podkładka naramienna; Podkładka pod kciuk; Inne
hr-HR: podrška razmak u podnožju: Jastučić za prsa; Pjenasta podstava; Podstava s gelom; Podstava na više točaka; Jastučić za vrat; Podstava od neoprena; Bez podstave; Jastučić za rame; Jastučić za palac; Ostalo
th: แผ่นรองกันกระแทก: แผ่นรองหน้าอก; แผ่นรองโฟม; แผ่นรองเจล; แผ่นรองหลายจุด; แผ่นรองคอ; แผ่นรองนีโอพรีน; ไม่มีแผ่นรอง; แผ่นรองบ่า; แผ่นรองนิ้วหัวแม่มือ; อื่นๆ
vi: Đệm hỗ trợ: Miếng đệm ngực; Đệm mút; Đệm gel; Đệm đa điểm; Miếng đệm cổ; Đệm Neoprene; Không đệm; Đệm vai; Đệm ngón cái; Khác
pt-BR: Apoio acolchoamento: Almofada para o peito; Acolchoamento de espuma; Acolchoamento de gel; Acolchoamento multiponto; Almofada para o pescoço; Acolchoamento de neoprene; Sem acolchoamento; Almofada para ombro; Almofada para polegar; Outros
zh-CN: 支撑衬垫: 胸垫; 泡沫垫; 凝胶垫; 多点支撑垫; 护颈垫; 氯丁橡胶垫; 无护垫; 肩垫; 拇指垫; 其他
hu: Tartópárnázat: Mellkaspárna; Habszivacs párnázás; Gélpárnázás; Többpontos párnázás; Nyakpárna; Neoprén párnázás; Nincs párnázás; Vállpárna; Hüvelykujjpárna; Egyéb